California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
This article establishes minimal requirements for the transportation, identification, disposition, and use of funds derived from the disposition of avocados seized pursuant to this article. A county may, by ordinance, impose additional requirements regarding these requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Organic Foods [46000. - 46029.]

46000.

(a) This chapter and Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code shall be known and may be cited as the California Organic Food and Farming Act.

(b) The secretary and county agricultural commissioners under the supervision and direction of the secretary shall enforce regulations adopted by the National Organic Program (NOP) (Section 6517 of the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.)), and Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code and this act applicable to any person selling products as
 organic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 2.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46001.

This chapter shall be interpreted in conjunction with Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code and regulations adopted by the National Organic Program (Section 6517 of the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 3.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46002.

(a) All organic food or product regulations and any amendments to those regulations adopted pursuant to the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.), that are in effect on the date this bill is enacted or that are adopted after that date, shall be the organic food and product regulations of this state.

(b) The secretary may, by regulation, prescribe conditions under which organic foods or other products not addressed by the National Organic Program may be sold in this state.

(c) The purpose of the act shall be to do both of the following:

(1) Promote coordination of federal, state, and local agencies in implementing the National Organic Program.

(2) Support organic agriculture through education, outreach, and other programmatic activities.

(d) The secretary may receive and expend state and federal funds for activities authorized under this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46003.

(a) The secretary shall establish an advisory committee, which shall be known as the California Organic Products Advisory Committee, for the purpose of advising the secretary with respect to his or her responsibilities under this act.

(b) The advisory committee shall advise the secretary on education, outreach, and technical assistance for producers.

(c) The advisory committee shall be comprised of 15 members. Each member may have an alternate. Six members and their alternates shall be producers, at least one of whom shall be a producer of meat, fowl, fish, dairy products, or eggs. Two members and their alternates shall be processors, one member and his or her alternate shall be wholesale distributors,
 one member and his or her alternate shall be representatives of an accredited certifying agency operating in the state, one member and his or her alternate shall be consumer representatives, one member and his or her alternate shall be environmental representatives, two members and their alternates shall be technical representatives with scientific credentials related to agricultural chemicals, toxicology, or food science, and one member and his or her alternate shall be retail representatives. Except for the consumer, environmental, and technical representatives, the members of the advisory committee and their alternates shall have derived a substantial portion of their business income, wages, or salary as a result of services they provide that directly result in the production, handling, processing, or retailing of products sold as organic for at least three years preceding their appointment to the advisory committee. The consumer and environmental representatives and their alternates shall not have a
 financial interest in the direct sales or marketing of the organic product industry and shall be members or employees of representatives of recognized nonprofit organizations whose principal purpose is the protection of consumer health or protection of the environment. The technical representatives and their alternates shall not have a financial interest in the production, handling, processing, or marketing of the organic products industry. The technical representatives may be involved in organic research or technical review providing they have no financial benefit from results of the research project or technical review.

(d) An alternate member shall serve at an advisory committee meeting only in the absence of, and shall have the same powers and duties as, the category that he or she is representing as alternate, except for duties and powers as an officer of the committee. The number of alternates present who are not serving in the capacity
 of a member shall not be considered in determining a quorum.

(e) An alternate member may serve at an advisory committee subcommittee meeting only in the absence of, and shall have the same powers and duties as, the member whom he or she is designated as alternate, except for duties and powers as a subcommittee chairperson.

(f) The members of the advisory committee and their alternates shall be reimbursed for the reasonable expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties, as determined by the advisory committee and approved by the secretary.

(g) The secretary or his or her representative, the State Public Health Officer or his or her representative, and a county agricultural commissioner may serve as ex officio members of the advisory committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 61.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

46003.2.

(a) To the extent that funds are available, the secretary, in consultation with the California Organic Products Advisory Committee, may establish procedures for and conduct all of the following activities:

(1) Receive and investigate complaints filed by any person concerning suspected acts of noncompliance with this act or federal organic standards.

(2) Conduct periodic announced and unannounced spot inspections.

(3) Collect samples to conduct periodic substance testing on products labeled as organic. There shall be no charge to the inspector or investigator for the samples taken.

(4) Conduct farmers’ market inspections.

(5) Support organic agriculture through education, outreach, and other programmatic activities.

(6) Reimburse investigation, enforcement, and market surveillance expenses, including expenses incurred by any county agricultural commissioner for actions conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(7) Conduct hearings, appeals, mediation, or settlement conferences from actions taken to enforce this chapter.

(b) Investigation, inspection, and prohibited material testing reports shall be forwarded to the secretary for any required enforcement action.

(c) The secretary shall coordinate activities authorized under this section with other county and
 state licensing, registration, inspection, and fee collection procedures applicable to registrants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46004.

(a) Any person may file a complaint with the director concerning suspected noncompliance with this chapter or Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code by a person under the enforcement jurisdiction of the director, as provided in Section 46000.

(b) The director shall, to the extent funds are available, establish procedures for handling complaints, including provision of a written complaint form, and
 procedures for commencing an investigation within three working days after receiving a complaint regarding fresh food, and within seven working days for other food, and completing an investigation and reporting findings and enforcement action taken, if any, to the complainant within 60 days thereafter.

(c) The director may establish minimum information requirements to determine the verifiability of a complaint, and may provide for rejection of a complaint that does not meet the requirements. The director shall provide written notice of the reasons for rejection to the person filing the complaint.

(d) The director shall carry out the functions and objectives of this chapter and Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, to the extent funds are available for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 69.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

46004.1.

Unless defined pursuant to the National Organic Program (NOP), the following words and phrases, when used in this act, shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Accredited certification agency” means an entity accredited by the United States Department of Agriculture to certify operations as compliant with the federal organic standards.

(b) “Act” means the California Organic Food and Farming Act. It also means the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.) and the regulations adopted pursuant to the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.).

(c) “Categorical products” means categories of products
 of like commodity, such as apples, salad products, etc., and does not require variety-specific information.

(d) “Certified operation” means a crop or livestock production or a wild crop harvesting or handling operation, or a portion of that operation, that is certified organic by an accredited certification agency as using a system of organic production or handling, as described by the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.) and implemented pursuant to the National Organic Program.

(e) “Data” means the information provided annually by persons registered under the act, including certified organic acreage and gross sales of certified organic products.

(f) “Director” means the director and State Public Health Officer for the State Department of Public Health.

(g) “Enforcement authority” means the governmental unit with primary enforcement jurisdiction, as provided in Section 46008.

(h) “Exempt handler” means a handling operation exempt from certification under federal organic standards that sells agricultural products as “organic” but whose gross agricultural income from organic sales totals five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less annually, that only handles agricultural products that contain less than 70 percent organic ingredients, as described in Section 205.301(d) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or that only identifies organic ingredients on the information panel.

(i) “Exempt operation” means a production or handling operation, retail establishment, or broker that sells agricultural products but is exempt from certification under federal organic
 standards.

(j) “Exempt producer” means a production operation that sells agricultural products as “organic” but whose gross agricultural income from organic sales totals five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less annually. An “exempt producer” is exempt from certification under federal organic standards.

(k) “Federal organic standards” means the federal regulations governing production, labeling, and marketing of organic products as authorized by the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.) and implemented pursuant to the National Organic Program (7 C.F.R. Sec. 205.1 et seq.), and any amendments to the federal act or regulations made subsequent to the enactment of this chapter.

(l) “Handle” means to sell, process, or package agricultural products, and includes, but is not limited to,
 trading, facilitating a sale or trade on behalf of a seller or oneself, importing to the United States, exporting for sale in the United States, combining, aggregating, culling, conditioning, treating, packing, containerizing, repackaging, labeling, storing, receiving, and loading.

(m) “Handler” means a person who handles agricultural products, except final retailers of agricultural products that do not process agricultural products.

(n) “Handling operation” means an operation that handles agricultural products, except final retailers of agricultural products that do not process agricultural products.

(o) “Inspection” means the act of examining and evaluating production or handling operation to determine compliance with state and federal law.

(p) “National Organic Program” or “NOP” means the National Organic Program established pursuant to the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.) and the regulations adopted for implementation.

(q) “Organic Integrity Database” means the National Organic Program’s electronic, web-based reporting tool for the submission of data, completion of certificates of organic operation, and other information, or the tool’s successors.

(r) “Person” means an individual, firm, partnership, trust, corporation, limited liability company, company, estate, public or private institution, association, organization, group, city, county, city and county, political subdivision of this state, other governmental agency within the state, and any representative, agent, or agency of any of the foregoing.

(s) “Processing” means cooking, baking, curing, heating, drying, mixing, grinding, churning, separating, extracting, slaughtering, cutting, distilling, fermenting, eviscerating, preserving, dehydrating, freezing, chilling, or otherwise manufacturing, and includes packaging, canning, jarring, or otherwise enclosing food in a container.

(t) “Producer” means a person who engages in the business of growing or producing food, fiber, feed, and other agricultural-based consumer products.

(u) “Prohibited substance” means a substance the use of which in any aspect of organic production or handling is prohibited or not provided for in state or federal laws, including statutes and regulations.

(v) “Residue testing” means an official or validated analytical procedure
 that detects, identifies, and measures the presence of chemical substances, their metabolites, or degradation products in or on raw or processed agricultural products.

(w) “Retail food establishment” means a restaurant, delicatessen, bakery, grocery store, or any retail business with a restaurant, delicatessen, bakery, bulk food self-service station, salad bar, or other eat-in, carry-out, mail order, or delivery service of raw or processed agricultural products.

(x) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(y) “State Organic Program” or “SOP” means a state program that meets the requirements of Section 6506 of the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.), is approved by the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture, and is designed to ensure that a
 product that is sold or labeled as organically produced under the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.) is produced and handled using organic methods.

(z) “USDA” means the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 3.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46005.

This act shall apply notwithstanding any other provision of law that is inconsistent with this act. Nothing in this act is intended to repeal any other provision of law not inconsistent with this act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 533, Sec. 7.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

46006.

At the request of a county agricultural commissioner, the district attorney for that county may bring an action to enforce this chapter or Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, within the enforcement jurisdiction of that commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 71.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

46007.

(a) Any penalties collected by the secretary and any fees collected by a county agricultural commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended solely to fulfill the responsibilities authorized under this chapter.

(b) Any fees and penalties collected by a county agricultural commissioner pursuant to Section 46017 and any other penalties collected by a county agricultural commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall be paid directly to the county agricultural commissioner and expended to fulfill the responsibilities of the county agricultural commissioner, as specified in
 this chapter.

(c) The secretary shall establish a specific minimum amount to be reimbursed to each county agricultural commissioner per registrant in that county. This reimbursement shall not limit the amount of the reimbursement otherwise made to county commissioners for their enforcement activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 8.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46008.

(a) Article 14 (commencing with Section 43031) of Chapter 2 of the Food and Agricultural Code applies to any product that is represented as organically produced by any person who is not registered as required by this chapter or any product that is not in compliance with this chapter or the NOP.

(b) The secretary, county agricultural commissioners, and the State Director of Health Services shall be considered enforcing officers for purposes of those provisions of law under their
 respective jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 533, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

46009.

Any person subject to this act that does not pay the registration fee within 10 days of the date on which the fee is due and payable shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the total amount determined to be due plus interest at the rate of 1.5 percent per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 393, Sec. 7.   (AB 2612)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

46010.

This chapter shall be interpreted in conjunction with Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 75.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

46010.5.

(a) No fee established and collected pursuant to this chapter shall exceed the secretary’s costs or the county agricultural commissioner’s costs, as the case may be, of regulating and enforcing the provisions of this chapter related to the function for which the fee is established.

(b) The fees established and collected pursuant to this chapter may be expended, under the advisement of the California Organic Products Advisory Committee, for activities authorized under this chapter, including assisting operations in achieving certification, conducting education and outreach, entering research and development partnerships, and addressing production or marketing obstacles to the growth
 of the organic sector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 9.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46011.

This act shall not apply to the term “natural” when used in the labeling or advertising of a product.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 533, Sec. 12.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

46012.

Article 14 (commencing with Section 43031) of Chapter 2 applies to any food product that is represented as organically produced by any person who is not registered as required by this chapter or any product that is not in compliance with this chapter or Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. The secretary, agricultural commissioners, and the director shall be considered enforcing officers for purposes of those provisions of law under their respective jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 10.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46013.

Any producer, handler, processor, or registered certification organization subject to this chapter that does not pay the fee within 10 days of the date on which the fee is due and payable shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the total amount determined to be due plus interest at the rate of 1.5 percent per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 393, Sec. 8.   (AB 2612)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

46013.1.

(a) Every person engaged in this state in the production or handling of raw agricultural products sold as organic shall register with the secretary before the first sale of the product. All processors of organic agriculturally derived products that are not required to be registered as outlined in subdivision (b) shall register with the secretary. Each registrant shall annually renew the registration with the secretary unless no longer engaged in the activities requiring the registration. An exempt handler, exempt operation, and exempt producer are only exempt from certification under federal organic standards and are still required to be registered with the State Organic Program.

(b) Every person engaged in this state in the processing or handling of processed
 products pursuant to Section 110460 of the Health and Safety Code, and pet food pursuant to Section 18653, and cosmetics pursuant to Section 111795 of the Health and Safety Code, including processors of alcoholic beverages, fish, and seafood, shall register with the State Public Health Officer.

(c) Registration pursuant to this section shall be on a form either provided by the secretary or approved by the secretary and shall be valid for a period of one calendar year from the date of validation by the secretary of the completed registration form or for a period determined by the secretary to promote coordination with organic certification applications and renewals, organic certification cost share programs, and other state program registration.

(d) The information provided on the registration form shall include all of the following:

(1) The nature of the registrant’s business, including the categorical products produced, handled, or processed that are sold as organic. For purposes of registration, organic products shall be reported in accordance with the following specified categories unless the secretary, in consultation with the California Organic Products Advisory Committee, establishes different categories:

(A) Citrus.

(B) Fruits, excluding citrus.

(C) Livestock or dairy.

(D) Nuts.

(E) Vegetables.

(F) Other, which includes, but is not limited to, apiculture, organic fallow ground, herbs,
 mushrooms, cut flowers, and nursery.

(2) The address or assessor’s parcel number of the precise location or locations where the products are produced, processed, or handled.

(3) Sufficient information, under penalty of perjury, to enable the secretary to verify the amount of the registration fee to be paid in accordance with this act.

(4) The names of all certification organizations or governmental entities, if any, providing organic certification to them.

(e) (1) A registration form shall be accompanied by payment of a nonrefundable registration fee by producers, handlers, and processors, which shall be based on total gross sales by the registrant of product sold as organic in the calendar year that precedes the date of
 registration or, if no sales were made in the preceding year, then based on the expected sales during the 12 calendar months following the date of registration in accordance with the following fee schedule. The secretary, in consultation with the California Organic Products Advisory Committee, may lower the amounts specified in the following fee schedule by regulation.Gross SalesRegistration Fee$0–4,999$25$5,000–10,000$50$10,001–50,000$75$50,001–250,000$100$250,001–500,000$450$500,001–1,000,000$750$1,000,001–2,500,000$1,000$2,500,001–5,000,000$1,500$5,000,001–15,000,000$2,000$15,000,001–25,000,000$2,500$25,000,001–and above$3,000(2) Producers that sell processed product shall pay fees based on the value of raw product before being processed and the value of any product sold as unprocessed.

(3) A person who (A) does not take title of an organic product that is outside the jurisdiction of the State Public Health Officer, (B) packs, repacks, labels,
 sorts, or otherwise handles the product, including, but not limited to, trading the product or facilitating the sale or trade of the product on behalf of a seller, and (C) provides only handling services for the product, shall register and pay one hundred dollars ($100) per year.

(4) A person who (A) takes title of an organic product that is outside the jurisdiction of the State Public Health Officer, (B) packs, repacks, labels, sorts, or otherwise handles the product, including, but not limited to, trading the product or facilitating the sale or trade of the product on behalf of a seller or themselves, and (C) provides only handling services for the product, shall register and pay a fee based on total gross sales of product sold as organic in the calendar year that precedes the date of registration or, if no sales were made in the preceding year, based on the expected sales during the 12 calendar months following the date of registration, in
 accordance with the fee schedule in paragraph (1).

(5) A person who provides temporary storage of 14 days or less or transportation for an organic product and does not handle the raw unpackaged product does not have to register.

(6) A person required to register pursuant to this section who fits the description of more than one of the persons described above shall pay the greater of the multiple amounts.

(7) The secretary may require any producer, handler, processor, or other organic registrant to provide the exact dollar amount of gross sales of twenty-five million one dollars ($25,000,001) or more in lieu of the range specified in paragraph (1).

(f) The secretary may adopt regulations that supersede the terms of this section to the extent reasonably
 necessary to provide an online system of registration for those required to register pursuant to this section.

(g) The adoption, amendment, or repeal of any fee pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. An order to adopt, amend, or repeal the regulations concerning assessment rates pursuant to this section shall be transmitted within 30 days by the secretary to the Office of Administrative Law. The Office of Administrative Law shall file the order promptly with the Secretary of State without further review pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 11349) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The order shall do all of the following:

(1) Indicate that the regulations are being adopted, amended, or repealed pursuant
 to this chapter.

(2) State that the order is being transmitted for filing.

(3) Request that the Office of Administrative Law publish a notice of the filing of the order and print an appropriate reference in Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 4.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46013.2.

(a) To the extent feasible, the secretary, in consultation with the director, shall coordinate the registration and annual fee collection procedures of this section with similar licensing or registration procedures applicable to registrants.

(b) The secretary shall deny a registration submission that is incomplete or not in compliance with this act.

(c) A registrant shall, within 30 days, notify the secretary of any change in the information reported on the registration form and shall pay any additional fee owed if that change results in a higher fee owed than that previously paid.

(d) (1) At the request of any
 person, the secretary or county agricultural commissioner shall provide the following:

(A) The name and address of the registrant.

(B) The nature of the registrant’s business.

(C) The names of all certification organizations or governmental entities, if any, providing certification pursuant to this act.

(2) The secretary or county agricultural commissioner may charge a reasonable fee for the cost of reproducing this information. Except as provided in this subdivision, a registration form is exempt from Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(e) The secretary, in consultation with the California Organic Products Advisory Committee, may suspend the
 registration program set forth in this section if the secretary determines that income derived from registration fees is insufficient to support a registration enforcement program.

(f) A registration is considered legal and valid until revoked, suspended, or until the expiration of the registration.

(g) The registration revocation process shall be in conjunction with other provisions of this act. The secretary or county agricultural commissioner’s office may initiate the revocation process for failure to comply with the NOP or this act. A person against whom the action is being taken shall have the opportunity to appeal the action and be afforded the opportunity to be heard in an administrative appeal. This appeal shall be administered by either the state or county agricultural commissioner’s office.

(h) If the
 registration fee is not paid within 60 days from the expiration date, the account shall be considered closed and the registration voided. A notification shall be sent to the registrant and the certifier, if applicable, notifying them the registrant is no longer able to market products as organic until the account is paid in full.

(i) A producer, handler, processor, or certification agency subject to this chapter that does not pay the fee within 10 days of the date on which the fee is due and payable shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the total amount determined to be due plus interest at the rate of 1.5 percent per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 5.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46014.

This chapter also applies to seed, fiber, and horticultural products. The terms “foods” and “raw agricultural commodities” as used in this chapter, and in Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, include seed, fiber, and horticultural products where the context requires to effectuate this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 77.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

46014.1.

(a) Any certification agency that certifies products in this state sold as organic shall register with the secretary and shall thereafter annually renew the registration, unless the organization is no longer engaged in the activities requiring the registration. Registration shall be on a form provided by the secretary and shall include a copy of accreditation by the USDA or proof of application, if applicable.

(b) Each certification agency shall pay to the secretary an annual registration fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each client they have certified in this state up to a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500). Any registration submitted by a certification agency shall be
 made available to the public for inspection and copying. The secretary may audit the agency’s certification procedures and records at any time, but any records of the certification agency not otherwise required to be disclosed shall be kept confidential by the secretary.

(c) An accredited certifying agency may submit an annual registration fee and application on behalf of their client provided that all of the information required under Section 46013.1 is included when remitting applicable fees to the secretary.

(d) The secretary and the county agricultural commissioners under the supervision of the secretary shall, if requested by a sufficient number of persons to cover the costs of the program in a county as determined by the secretary, establish a certification program.
 This program shall meet all of the requirements of this act. In addition, this program shall meet all of the requirements of the federal certification program, including federal accreditation. The secretary shall establish a fee schedule for participants in this program that covers all of the secretary’s reasonable costs of the program. A county agricultural commissioner that conducts a voluntary certification program pursuant to this section shall establish a fee schedule for participants in this program that covers all of the county’s reasonable costs of the program. The secretary shall not expend funds obtained from registration fees collected under this chapter for the purposes of adopting or administering this program. The certification fee authorized by this subdivision is due and payable on January 1 or may be prorated before the 10th day of the month following the month in which the decision to
 grant the certification is issued. Any person who does not pay the amount that is due within the required period shall pay the enforcement authority providing the certificate a penalty of 10 percent of the total amount determined to be due, plus interest at the rate of 1.5 percent per month on the unpaid balance.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, any certification agency that certifies products in this state sold as organic shall immediately make the following records available for inspection by, and shall upon request within three business days of the request, or within a reasonable time exceeding three business days as determined by the secretary, provide a copy to, the secretary or county agricultural commissioner:

(1) Records obtained from applicants for certification and certified
 operations.

(2) Records created by the certifying agent regarding applicants for certification and certified operations.

(3) Any record required to be kept under the National Organic Program (Section 6517 of the federal Organic Foods Production Act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.) and 7 C.F.R. 205 et seq.), Article 7 (commencing with Section 110810) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, and this act applicable to any person selling products as organic.

(f) Records acquired pursuant to this section shall not be public records as that term is defined in Section 7920.530 of the Government Code and shall not be subject to Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of
 the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 127.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

46014.2.

(a) All products sold as organic in California shall be certified by an accredited certifying agent if they are required to be certified under the federal act.

(b) Product shall be sold as organic only in accordance with this act.

(c) A certification agency shall be accredited by the USDA as provided in the NOP.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 14.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46014.4.

A registered certification agency shall submit to the secretary every January and June a list of all persons whose production or processing of product in California is certified. The list shall be publicly available within 30 days after the end of each filing period. A certifier that keeps a current list on an Internet Web site available to the public may be deemed to meet this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 15.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46014.6.

Only products that have been produced and handled in accordance with this act may be certified by a registered certification agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 403, Sec. 16.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

46015.

Materials acceptable in this state are those outlined in Sections 205.600 to 205.607, inclusive, of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 533, Sec. 21.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

46016.1.

(a) A person may file a complaint with the secretary concerning suspected noncompliance with this act, as provided in Section 46000 or regulations adopted by the NOP.

(b) The secretary shall, to the extent funds are available, establish procedures for handling complaints, including provision of a written complaint form, and procedures for commencing an investigation within five working days after receiving a complaint regarding fresh food, and within seven working days for other products, and completing an investigation and reporting findings and enforcement action taken, if any, to the complainant within 120 days thereafter.

(c) The secretary may establish
 minimum information requirements to determine the verifiability of a complaint, and may provide for rejection of a complaint that does not meet the requirements. The secretary shall provide written notice of the reasons for rejection to the person filing the complaint.

(d) The secretary shall carry out the functions and objectives of this act to the extent funds are available for those purposes.

(e) The complaint process in this state must also meet all the complaint process outlined in regulations adopted by the NOP.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 456, Sec. 6.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

46016.2.

(a) Any county agricultural commissioner may, at any time, initiate a notice and hearing process to determine whether a violation of these provisions has occurred. The hearing process to determine if a violation has occurred may include a review of the actions or records of:

(1) The organic registrant.

(2) A family member, employee, or any other person authorized to act on behalf of the registrant.

(3) Any other person whose actions may have resulted in the violation.

(b) The notice of hearing shall be on a form approved by the secretary and may contain:

(1) The reasons why the hearing is being held.

(2) A warning that failure to participate may result in other adverse actions or may be considered to be admission to a possible violation.
